en: E445, Glycerol esters of wood rosin, Glycerol ester of wood rosin, glyceryl abietate, ester gum
xx: E445
bg: E445, Глицеролови естери на дървесна смола
ca: E445, Èster glicèrid de la colofònia de fusta
cs: E445, Glycerolestery dřevných pryskyřic
da: E445, Glycerolestere af fyrreharpiks
de: E445, Glycerinester aus Wurzelharz, Harzester, Estergummi, Glycerinester, Glyzerinester
el: E445, Εστερες γλυκερολης με κολοφωνιο ξυλου
es: E445, Ésteres glicéridos de resina de madera, Éster glicérido de resina de madera, Ésteres glicéridos de colofonia de madera
et: E445, kampoli glütseroolestrid
fi: E445, Puuhartsien glyseroliesterit, Puuhartsien glyseroliestereitä
fr: E445, Esters glycériques de résine de bois, Esters glycéroliques de résine de bois, Gomme ester, Ester glycérique de résine de bois
hr: E445
hu: E445, Fagyanta glicerin-észterei, Fagyanták glicerin-észterei
it: E445, Esteri della glicerina della resina del legno
ja: E445, ウッドロジングリセリンエステル
lt: E445, Medienos kanifolijos glicerolio esteriai
lv: E445, Kolofonija glicerīna esteri
mt: E445, Esteri tal-gliċerol tar-rożin tal-injam
nb: E445, Glyserolestere av trekolofonium
nl: E445, Glycerolesters van houthars
pl: E445, Estry glicerolu i żywicy roślinnej
pt: E445, Ésteres de glicerol da colofónia
ro: E445, Esteri glicerinici ai colofoniului din lemn, Esteri glicerici ai răşinilor din lemn, Esteri glicerici ai răşinilor de lemn
sk: E445, Glycerolestery živíc z dreva
sl: E445, Glicerolni estri lesne smole
sv: E445, Glycerolestrar av trähartser

en: E445(i), Glycerol ester of gum rosin
xx: E445(i)

en: E445(ii), Glycerol ester of tall oil rosin
xx: E445(ii)

en: E445(iii)
xx: E445(iii)

en: E446, Succistearin
xx: E446
ar: E446, سكسيستيرين
bg: E446, Сукцистеарин
ca: E446, Succistearina
cs: E446, Sukcistearin
da: E446, Succistearin
de: E446, Succistearin
el: E446, Σουκκιστεαρίνη
eo: E446, Sukcistearino
es: E446, Succistearina
et: E446, Suktsisteariin
fa: E446, سوکسیستئارین
fi: E446, Sukkisteariini, Sukkisteariinia
fr: E446, Succistéarine
he: E446, סוקסיסטארין
hi: E446, सक्सिस्टेरिन
hr: E446, Sukcistearin
hu: E446, Szukcisztearin
id: E446, Suksisstearin
it: E446, Succistearina
ja: E446, サクシステアリン
ko: E446, 숙시스테아린
lt: E446, Sukcistearinas
lv: E446, Sukcistearīns
mk: E446, Сукцистеарин
ms: E446, Suksisstearin
mt: E446, Suċċistearin
nl: E446, Succistearine
pl: E446, Sukcystearyna
pt: E446, Succistearina
ro: E446, Succistearină
ru: E446, Сукцистеарин
sk: E446, Sukcistearín
sl: E446, Sukcistearin
sq: E446, Sukcistearin
sr: E446, Сукцистеарин
sv: E446, Succistearin
tr: E446, Sükkistearin
uk: E446, Сукцистеарин
vi: E446, Succistearin
zh: E446, 琥珀酸硬脂酸酯

en: E540, Dicalcium diphosphate
xx: E540
ar: E540, ثنائي فوسفات الكالسيوم
bg: E540, Дикалциев дифосфат
ca: E540, Difosfat dicàlcic
cs: E540
da: E540, Dicalciumdiphosphat
de: E540, Dicalciumdiphosphat
el: E540, Διφωσφορικό διασβέστιο
eo: E540, Dukalcia difosfato
es: E540, Difosfato dicálcico
et: E540, Dikaltsiumdifosfaat
fa: E540, دی کلسیم دی فسفات
fi: E540, Dikalsiumvetyfosfaatti, Dikalsiumvetyfosfaattia
fr: E540, Phosphate acide de calcium, Diphosphate dicalcique
hr: E540, Dikalcijev difosfat
hu: E540, Dikalcium-difoszfát
it: E540, Difosfato dicalcico
ja: E540, リン酸二カルシウム
ko: E540, 인산이칼슘
lt: E540, Dikalcio difosfatas
lv: E540, Dikalcija difosfāts
mt: E540, Difosfat dikalċiku
nl: E540, Dicalciumpyrofosfaat, Dicalciumdifosfaat
pl: E540, Difosforan diwapniowy
pt: E540, Difosfato dicálcico
ro: E540, Difosfat dicalcic
ru: E540, Дикальцийдифосфат
sk: E540, Dikalciumdifosfát
sl: E540, Dikalcijev difosfat
sv: E540, Dikalciumdifosfat
zh: E540, 磷酸二钙

en: E541, Sodium aluminium phosphate
xx: E541
bg: E541, Натриевоалуминиев фосфат
ca: E541, Fosfat de sodi i alumini
cs: E541, fosforečnan sodno-hlinitý
da: E541, Natriumaluminiumphosphater
de: E541, Natriumaluminiumphosphat
es: E541, Fosfato de aluminio y sodio
et: E541, Naatriumalumiiniumfosfaat
fi: E541, Natriumalumiinifosfaatti, hapan, Natriumalumiinifosfaattia
fr: E541, Phosphate d'aluminium et de sodium, Phosphate de sodium-aluminium
hu: E541, Nátrium-alumínium-foszfát
it: E541, Fosfato di sodio e alluminio
lt: E541, Natrio aliuminio fosfatas
lv: E541, Skābais nātrija alumīnija fosfāts
mt: E541, Fosfat tas-sodju u tal-aluminju
nl: E541, Natriumaluminiumfosfaten
pl: E541, Fosforan glinowo-sodowy
pt: E541, Fosfato de alumínio e sódio
ro: E541, Fosfat de aluminiu și sodiu
sk: E541, Hydrogénfosforečnan hlinito-sodný
sl: E541, Natrijev aluminijev fosfat
sv: E541, Natriumaluminiumfosfat

en: E541(i), Acid sodium aluminium phosphate
xx: E541(i)
bg: E541(i), Натриевоалуминиев фосфат кисел
ca: E541(i), Fosfat àcid de sodi i alumini
cs: E541(i), Kyselý fosforečnan sodno-hlinitý
da: E541(i), Natriumaluminiumphosphat, surt
de: E541(i), Saures natriumaluminiumphosphat
el: E541(i), Οξινο φωσφορικο αργιλιονατριο
es: E541(i), Fosfato ácido de aluminio y sodio
fi: E541(i), elintarvikelisäaine
fr: E541(i), Phosphate de sodium-aluminium acide, acidic SALP, Levair, Phosphate d'aluminium sodique acide
hu: E541(i), Savas nátrium-alumínium-foszfát
it: E541(i), Fosfato acido di sodio e alluminio
lt: E541(i), Natrio aliuminio fosfatas rūgštinis
mt: E541(i), Fosfat tas-sodju u tal-aluminju aċidiku
nl: E541(i), zuur Natriumaluminiumfosfaat, Natriumaluminiumfosfaat zuur
pl: E541(i), Fosforan glinowo-sodowy kwaśny
pt: E541(i), Fosfato ácido de alumínio e sódio
ro: E541(i), Fosfat de aluminiu și sodiu acid
sk: E541(i), Hydrogénfosforečnan hlinito-sodný kyslý
sl: E541(i), Natrijev aluminijev fosfat kisli
sv: E541(i), Natriumaluminiumfosfat surt

en: E541(ii), Alkaline sodium aluminium phosphate
xx: E541(ii)
ca: E541(ii), Fosfat alcalí de sodi i alumini
cs: E541(ii), Alkalický fosforečnan sodno-hlinitý
da: E541(ii), Alkalisk natriumaluminiumphosphat
de: E541(ii), Alkalisches Natriumaluminiumphosphat
el: E541(ii), Αλκαλικό φωσφορικό αργιλιονατριο
es: E541(ii), Fosfato alcalino de aluminio y sodio
et: E541(ii), Aluseline naatriumalumiiniumfosfaat
fi: E541(ii), Emäksinen natriumalumiinifosfaatti
fr: E541(ii), Phosphate de sodium-aluminium basique, basic SALP, Kasal
hu: E541(ii), Lúgos nátrium-alumínium-foszfát
it: E541(ii), Fosfato alcalino di sodio e alluminio
lt: E541(ii), Šarminis natrio aliuminio fosfatas
lv: E541(ii), Sārmains nātrija alumīnija fosfāts
nl: E541(ii), Basisch natriumaluminiumfosfaat
pl: E541(ii), Zasadowy glinofosforan sodu
pt: E541(ii), Fosfato alcalino de alumínio e sódio
ro: E541(ii), Fosfat alcalin de aluminiu și sodiu
sk: E541(ii), Alkalický hydrogénfosforečnan hlinito-sodný
sl: E541(ii), Alkalni natrijev aluminijev fosfat
sv: E541(ii), Alkaliskt natriumaluminiumfosfat

en: E542, Bone phosphate, Bone phosphate (Essentiale Calcium Phosphate\, Tribasic)
xx: E542
ar: E542, فوسفات العظام
az: E542, Sümük fosfatı
bg: E542, Костен фосфат
ca: E542, Fosfat d'os
cs: E542, Kostní fosfát
da: E542, Knoglefosfat
de: E542, Knochenphosphat
el: E542, Οστικό φωσφορικό άλας
eo: E542, Osta fosfato
es: E542, Fosfato de hueso
et: E542, Luufosfaat
eu: E542, Hezur fosfatoa
fa: E542, فسفات استخوان
fi: E542, Luun fosfaatti, Luun fosfaattia
fr: E542, Phosphate d'os comestible, Phosphate d'os, Bone phosphate
gl: E542, Fosfato óseo
he: E542, פוספט עצם
hi: E542, अस्थि फास्फेट
hr: E542, Koštani fosfat
hu: E542, Csontfoszfát
id: E542, Tulang fosfat
it: E542, Fosfato osseo
ja: E542, 骨リン酸
ko: E542, 뼈 인산염
lt: E542, Kaulų fosfatas
lv: E542, Kaulu fosfāts
mk: E542, Коскен фосфат
ms: E542, Tulang fosfat
mt: E542, Fosfat tal-għadam
nl: E542, Beendermeel, Beenderfosfaat
pl: E542, Fosforan kostny
pt: E542, Fosfato de osso
ro: E542, Fosfat osos
ru: E542, Костный фосфат
sk: E542, Kostný fosfát
sl: E542, Kostni fosfat
sq: E542, Fosfat kockash
sr: E542, Коштани фосфат
sv: E542, Benfosfat
ta: E542, எலும்பு பாஸ்பேட்
tr: E542, Kemik fosfat
uk: E542, Кiстковий фосфат
zh: E542, 骨磷酸盐

en: E543, E543 food additive
xx: E543

en: E544, Calcium polyphosphate
xx: E544
ar: E544, بولي فوسفات الكالسيوم
bg: E544, Калциев полифосфат
ca: E544, Polifosfat de calci
cs: E544, Polyfosforečnan vápenatý
da: E544, Calciumpolyphosphat
de: E544, Calcium polyphosphat
el: E544, Πολυφωσφορικό ασβέστιο
eo: E544, Kalcia polifosfato
es: E544, Polifosfato de calcio
et: E544, Kaltsiumpolüfosfaat
fa: E544, پلی فسفات کلسیم
fi: E544, Kalsiumpolyfosfaatti, Kalsiumpolyfosfaattia
fr: E544, Polyphosphate de calcium
he: E544, פוליפוספט הסידן
hr: E544, Kalcijev polifosfat
hu: E544, Kalcium-polifoszfát
id: E544, Kalsium polifosfat
it: E544, Polifosfato di calcio
ja: E544, ポリリン酸カルシウム
ko: E544, 폴리인산 칼슘
lt: E544, Kalcio polifosfatas
lv: E544, Kalcija polifosfāts
mk: E544, Калциум полифосфат
mt: E544, Polifosfat tal-kalċju
nl: E544, Calciumpolyfosfaat
pl: E544, Polifosforan wapnia
pt: E544, Polifosfato de cálcio
ro: E544, Polifosfat de calciu
ru: E544, Полифосфат кальция
sk: E544, Polyfosforečnan vápenatý
sl: E544, Kalcijev polifosfat
sq: E544, Polifosfat kalciumi
sr: E544, Калијум полифосфат
sv: E544, Kalciumpolyfosfat
th: E544, แคลเซียมโพลีฟอสเฟต
tr: E544, Kalsiyum polifosfat
uk: E544, Поліфосфат кальцію
vi: E544, Polyphosphat canxi
zh: E544, 多磷酸钙

en: E545, Ammonium polyphosphate
xx: E545
ar: E545, بولي فوسفات الأمونيوم
az: E545, Ammonium polifosfat
bg: E545, Амониев полифосфат
ca: E545, Polifosfat d'amoni
cs: E545, Polyfosforečnan amonný
da: E545, Ammoniumpolyphosphat
de: E545, Ammoniumpolyphosphat
el: E545, Πολυφωσφορικό αμμώνιο
eo: E545, Amonia polifosfato
es: E545, Polifosfato de amonio
et: E545, Ammooniumpolüfosfaat
fa: E545, پلی فسفات آمونیوم
fi: E545, Ammoniumpolyfosfaatti, Ammoniumpolyfosfaattia
fr: E545, Polyphosphate d'ammonium
he: E545, פוליפוספט אמוניום
hr: E545, Amonijev polifosfat
hu: E545, Ammónium-polifoszfát
id: E545, Ammonium polifosfat
it: E545, Polifosfato di ammonio
ja: E545, ポリリン酸アンモニウム
ko: E545, 폴리인산 암모늄
lt: E545, Amonio polifosfatas
lv: E545, Amonija polifosfāts
mk: E545, Амониум полифосфат
mt: E545, Polifosfat tal-ammonju
nl: E545, Ammoniumpolyfosfaat, Polyammoniumfosfaat
pl: E545, Polifosforan amonu
pt: E545, Polifosfato de amónio
ro: E545, Polifosfat de amoniu
ru: E545, Полифосфат аммония
sk: E545, Polyfosforečnan amónny
sl: E545, Amonijev polifosfat
sr: E545, Амонијум полифосфат
sv: E545, Ammoniumpolyfosfat
tr: E545, Amonyum polifosfat
uk: E545, Поліфосфат амонію
zh: E545, 聚磷酸铵

en: E546, Magnesium pyrophosphate
xx: E546
ar: بيروفوسفات المغنيسيوم
az: maqnezium pirofosfat
bg: Магнезиев пирофосфат
ca: pirofosfat de magnesi
cs: hořečnatý pyrofosfát
da: magnesiumpyrophosphat
de: Magnesiumpyrophosphat
el: πυροφωσφορικό μαγνήσιο
eo: magnezia pirofosfato
es: pirofosfato de magnesio
et: magneesiumpürofosfaat
fa: پیروفسفات منیزیم
fi: Magnesiumpyrofosfaatti, Magnesiumpyrofosfaattia
fr: Pyrophosphate de magnésium
he: מגנזיום פירופוספט
hr: magnezijev pirofosfat
hu: Magnézium-pirofoszfát
id: magnesium pirofosfat
it: pirofosfato di magnesio
ja: ピロリン酸マグネシウム
ko: 마그네슘 피로포스페이트
lt: magnio pirofosfatas
lv: magnija pirofosfāts
mk: магнезиум пирофосфат
ms: magnesium pirofosfat
mt: pirofosfat tal-manjeżju
nl: Magnesiumpyrofosfaat
pl: pirofosforan magnezu
pt: pirofosfato de magnésio
ro: pirofosfat de magneziu
ru: пирофосфат магния
sk: pyrofosforečnan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev pirofosfat
sq: pirofosfat magnezi
sr: магнезијум пирофосфат
sv: magnesiumpyrofosfat
tr: magnezyum pirofosfat
uk: пірофосфат магнію
zh: 焦磷酸镁

en: E550, Sodium silicate , Sodium Silicates (i)\, Sodium silicate (ii)\, Sodium metasilicate
xx: E550
ar: E550, سيليكات الصوديوم
az: E550, Natrium silikat
bg: E550, Натриев силикат
ca: E550, Silicat de sodi
cs: E550, Kremičitan sodný
da: E550, Natriumsilikat
de: E550, Natriumsilikat
el: E550, Πυριτικό νάτριο
eo: E550, Natria silikato
es: E550, Silicato de sodio
et: E550, Naatriumsilikaat
fa: E550, سیلیکات سدیم
fi: E550, Natriumsilikaatti, Natriumsilikaattia
fr: E550, Silicate de sodium, Métasilicate de sodium
he: E550, צורן נתרן
hr: E550, Natrijev silikat
hu: E550, Nátrium-szilikát
id: E550, Natrium silikat
it: E550, Silicato di sodio
ja: E550, ケイ酸ナトリウム
ko: E550, 규산 나트륨
lt: E550, Natrio silikatas
lv: E550, Nātrija silikāts
mk: E550, Натриум силикат
ms: E550, Natrium silikat
nl: E550, Natriumsilicaten
pl: E550, Krzemian sodu
pt: E550, Silicato de sódio
ro: E550, Silicat de sodiu
ru: E550, Силикат натрия
sk: E550, Kremičitan sodný
sl: E550, Natrijev silikat
sr: E550, Натријум силикат
sv: E550, Natriumsilikat
tr: E550, Sodyum silikat
uk: E550, Силікат натрію
zh: E550, 硅酸钠

en: E550(i)
xx: E550(i)

en: E550(ii), Sodium metasilicate
xx: E550(ii)

en: E450, Diphosphates, Pyrophosphate, diphosphate, E-450, e 450, e450 stabilizer
xx: E450
ar: E450, ثنائي الفوسفات
az: E450, Difosfat
bg: E450, Дифосфат, дифосфати, стабилизатор E450
ca: E450, Difosfat
cs: E450, Difosfát, difosforečnany
da: E450, diphosphater
de: E450, Diphosphate, Diphosphat, Stabilisator E450
el: E450, Διφωσφορικά άλατα
eo: E450, Du fosfato
es: E450, Difosfatos, Difosfato, Pirofosfato, estabilizante e450
et: E450, Difosfaat
fa: E450, دی فسفات, پیروفسفات
fi: E450, Difosfaatit, Pyrofosfaatti, Difosfaatteja, Pyrofosfaattia
fr: E450, Diphosphates, Sels métalliques de diphosphates, Pyrophosphates, Diphosphate, Pyrophosphate, dipolyphosphate, stabilisant e450
ga: E450, Défosfáit
gl: E450, Difosfatos
he: E450, דיפוספטים
hr: E450, difosfati, difosfat, e450 stabilizator
hu: E450, Difoszfátok
id: E450, Difosfat
it: E450, Pirofosfato, difosfati, stabilizzante e450
ja: E450, 二リン酸塩, ピロリン酸塩
ko: E450, 디포스페이트
lt: E450, Difosfatas, emulsiklis difosfatai, stabilizatorius e450, stabilizatoriai e450
lv: E450, Difosfāts
mk: E450, Дифосфати
mt: E450, Difosfat
nb: E450, Difosfater, Difosfat
nl: E450, difosfaat, Pyrofosfaat, stabilisator e450
pl: E450, Difosforany, Pirofosforany, difosforan
pt: E450, Pirofosfato, difosfato, estabilizante e450
ro: E450, difosfați
ru: E450, Пирофосфаты, Пирофосфат, двузамещенный пирофосфат натрия, трехзамещенный пирофосфат натрия, тетранатрийпирофосфат, двузамещенный пирофосфат калия, тетракалийдифосфат, дикальцийпирофосфат, кальцийдигидропирофосфат
sk: E450, Difosfáty, difosforečnany
sl: E450, Difosfati
sr: E450, Дифосфати
sv: E450, Difosfater, Pyrofosfat
th: E450, ไดฟอสเฟต
tr: E450, Difosfat
uk: E450, Дифосфати
vi: E450, Diphosphat
zh: E450, 焦磷酸盐

en: E450(i), Disodium diphosphate, Sodium Acid Pyrophosphate, sapp, disodium dihydrogen pyrophosphate, disodium pyrophosphate, sodium acid pyrophosphate, disodium diphosphate, disodium dihydrogen diphosphate
xx: E450(i)
ar: E450(i), بيروفوسفات ثنائي الصوديوم
bg: E450(i), Динатриев дифосфат
ca: E450(i), difosfat de disodi
cs: E450(i)diphosphate-disodique, Dihydrogendifosforečnan disodný
da: E450(i), Dinatriumdiphosphat
de: E450(i), Dinatriumdiphosphat, Dinatriumdihydrogendiphosphat
el: E450(i), Δισοξινο πυροφωσφορικο νατριο
es: E450(i), Difosfato disódico, Pirofosfato ácido de sodio
et: E450(i), Dinaatriumdifosfaat, Dinaatriumdivesinikdifosfaat
fa: E450(i), دی‌سدیم پیروفسفات
fi: E450(i), Dinatriumdifosfaatti, Dinatriumdivetydifosfaatti, Dinatriumdivetypyrofosfaatti, Hapan natriumpyrofosfaatti, Dinatriumdifosfaattia, Dinatriumdivetydifosfaattia, Dinatriumdivetypyrofosfaattia, E450a
fr: E450(i), Pyrophosphate de sodium acide, Pyrophosphate acide de sodium, Diphosphate disodique, diphosphate de sodium, Di-sodium di-phosphate, di-sodium pyrophosphate, Dihydrogéno-diphosphate disodique, Dihydrogéno-pyrophosphate disodique, Pyrophosphate disodique, Disodium pyrophosphate, sodium acid pyrophosphate, SAPP, Diphosphoric acid disodium salt
hr: E450(i), E450i, dinatrijev difosfat
hu: E450(i), Dinátrium-difoszfát
it: E450(i), Difosfato disodico
ja: E450(i), ピロリン酸ナトリウム, ピロリン酸Na, ピロリン酸Ｎａ, 二リン酸二水素二ナトリウム
lt: E450(i), Dinatrio difosfatas
lv: E450(i), Dinātrija difosfāts
mt: E450(i), Difosfat disodiku, Difosfat didroġenat disodiku, Pirofosfat didroġenat disodiku, Pirofosfat tal-aċidu tas-sodju
nl: E450(i), Dinatriumdifosfaat, zuurnatriumpyrofosfaat
pl: E450(i), Difosforan disodowy, Difosforan diwodoro-disodowy, pirofosforan diwodoro-disodowy, kwaśny pirofosforan sodu
pt: E450(i), Difosfato dissódico
ro: E450(i), Difosfat disodic, Difosfat diacid disodic, Pirofosfat diacid disodic, Pirofosfat acid de sodiu
ru: E450(i), дигидропирофосфат натрия
sh: E450(i), Dinatrijum pirofosfat
sk: E450(i), Difosforečnan disodný
sl: E450(i), Dinatrijev difosfat
sr: E450(i), Dinatrijum pirofosfat
sv: E450(i), Dinatriumdifosfat, Dinatriumdivätedifosfat, dinatriumdivätepyrofosfat, natriumpyrofosfatsyra
vi: E450(i), Natri đihiđropyrophotphat
zh: E450(i), 酸式焦磷酸钠

en: E450(ii), Trisodium diphosphate, e450ii
xx: E450(ii)
bg: E450(ii), Тринатриев дифосфат
cs: E450(ii), Hydrogendifosforečnan sodný
da: E450(ii), Trinatriumdiphosphat
de: E450(ii), Trinatriumdiphosphat
el: E450(ii), Οξινο πυροφωσφορικο νατριο
es: E450(ii), Difosfato trisódico
et: E450(ii), Trinaatriumdifosfaat, Trinaatriumvesinikdifosfaat, trinaatriumpürofosfaat
fi: E450(ii), Trinatriumdifosfaatti, Trinatriumpyrofosfaatti, Trinatriumdifosfaattia, Trinatriumpyrofosfaattia
fr: E450(ii), Diphosphate trisodique, Pyrophosphate trisodique acide, Hydrogéno-diphosphate trisodique, Tri-sodium di-phosphate, CAS 14691-80-6, CAS 26573-04-6
hr: E450(ii), trinatrijev difosfat
hu: E450(ii), Trinátrium-difoszfát
it: E450(ii), Difosfato trisodico
lt: E450(ii), Trinatrio difosfatas
lv: E450(ii), Trinātrija difosfāts
mt: E450(ii), Difosfat trisodiku
nl: E450(ii), Trinatriumdifosfaat
pl: E450(ii), Difosforan trisodowy
pt: E450(ii), Difosfato trissódico
ro: E450(ii), Difosfat trisodic, Pirofosfat trisodic, Difosfat monoacid trisodic, Pirofosfat monoacid trisodic
sk: E450(ii), Difosforečnan trisodný
sl: E450(ii), Trinatrijev difosfat
sv: E450(ii), Trinatriumdifosfat, Trinatriumpyrofosfat, trinatriumvätedifosfat